North Carolina, session 2025, SB588.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 95-151 reads as rewritten:
"§ 95-151. Discrimination.
No employer, employee, or any other person related to the administration of this Article shall
be discriminated against in any work, procedure, or employment by reason of sex, race,
pregnancy, ethnic origin, or by reason of religious affiliation."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 126-34.02(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The following issues may be heard as contested cases after completion of the agency
grievance procedure and the Office of State Human Resources review:
(1) Discrimination or harassment. – An applicant for State employment, a State
employee, or former State employee may allege discrimination or harassment
based on race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, disability, pregnancy,
genetic information, or political affiliation if the employee believes that he or
she has been discriminated against in his or her application for employment
or in the terms and conditions of the employee's employment, or in the
termination of his or her employment.
(2) Retaliation. – An applicant for State employment, a State employee, or former
State employee may allege retaliation for protesting discrimination based on
race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, disability, pregnancy, political
affiliation, or genetic information if the employee believes that he or she has
been retaliated against in his or her application for employment or in the terms
and conditions of the employee's employment, or in the termination of the
employee's employment.
…."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 168A-3 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(7b) Pregnancy and pregnancy-related conditions. – Pregnancy, childbirth, and
related medical conditions, including lactation. Pregnancy and
pregnancy-related conditions shall be considered a physical impairment for
the purposes of this Chapter when they substantially limit one or more major
life activities."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 168A-5 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(a1) Pregnancy accommodations. – It is a discriminatory practice if an employer fails to
provide reasonable accommodations for any limitation of an employee related to pregnancy,
childbirth, or a related medical condition, unless the employer can demonstrate that providing
*S588-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
such accommodations would impose an undue hardship on the operation of the business of the
employer. Reasonable accommodations may include, but are not limited to any one or more of
the following:
(1) More frequent or longer bathroom breaks.
(2) Breaks for increased hydration.
(3) Breaks for periodic rest.
(4) Assistance with heavy manual labor.
(5) Job restructuring.
(6) Modified work schedules.
(7) Temporary transfer to a less strenuous or hazardous position.
(8) Providing a vacant position to an employee who cannot perform the essential
functions of her job due to pregnancy or a pregnancy-related condition.
(9) Providing seating.
(10) Allowing the employee to maintain a healthy weight.
(11) Providing break time and appropriate facilities for expressing breast milk."
SECTION 3. G.S. 41A-3(3a) reads as rewritten:
"(3a) 'Handicapping condition' means (i) a physical or mental impairment which
substantially limits one or more of a person's major life activities, (ii) a record
of having such an impairment, or (iii) being regarded as having such an
impairment. Handicapping condition does not include current, illegal use of
or addiction to a controlled substance as defined in 21 U.S.C. § 802, the
Controlled Substances Act. Handicapping condition includes pregnancy and
pregnancy-related conditions as defined in G.S. 168A-3. The protections
against discrimination on the basis of handicapping condition shall apply to a
buyer or renter of a dwelling, a person residing in or intending to reside in the
dwelling after it is sold, rented, or made available, or any person associated
with the buyer or renter."
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies to acts and
omission occurring on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 588-First Edition